Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.055

Director of retirement systems to administer Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system—Duties.

The administration of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system is hereby vested in the director of retirement systems, and the director shall:

(1) Keep in convenient form such data as shall be deemed necessary for actuarial evaluation purposes;

(2) As of March 1, 1970, and at least every two years thereafter, through the state actuary, make an actuarial valuation as to the mortality and service experience of the beneficiaries under this chapter and the various accounts created for the purpose of showing the financial status of the retirement fund;

(3) Adopt for the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system the mortality tables and such other tables as shall be deemed necessary;

(4) Keep a record of all its proceedings, which shall be open to inspection by the public;

(5) From time to time adopt such rules and regulations not inconsistent with chapter 41.26 RCW, for the administration of the provisions of this chapter, for the administration of the fund created by this chapter and the several accounts thereof, and for the transaction of the business of the system;

(6) Prepare and publish annually a financial statement showing the condition of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' fund and the various accounts thereof, and setting forth such other facts, recommendations and data as may be of use in the advancement of knowledge concerning the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, and furnish a copy thereof to each employer, and to such members as may request copies thereof;

(7) Perform such other functions as are required for the execution of the provisions of chapter 41.26 RCW;

(8) Fix the amount of interest to be credited at a rate which shall be based upon the net annual earnings of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' fund for the preceding twelve-month period and from time to time make any necessary changes in such rate;

(9) Pay from the department of retirement systems expense fund the expenses incurred in administration of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system from those funds appropriated for that purpose;

(10) Perform any other duties prescribed elsewhere in chapter 41.26 RCW;

(11) Issue decisions relating to appeals initiated pursuant to RCW 41.16.145 and 41.18.104 as now or hereafter amended and shall be authorized to order increased benefits pursuant to RCW 41.16.145 and 41.18.104 as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1991 c 35 s 16; 1982 c 163 s 6; 1981 c 3 s 27; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 44 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 216 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 6. Formerly RCW 41.26.060.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Severability—Effective date—1982 c 163: See notes following RCW 2.10.052.

Intent of amendment—1981 c 3: See note following RCW 2.10.080.

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 3: See notes following RCW 43.33A.010.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 216: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 216 s 4.]